Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,366
Smoke control system; removal or change; prohibited; exception.

No one shall intentionally make a change or other alteration to any diesel-powered motor vehicle equipped by its manufacturer with a smoke control system, including the basic fuel system, that may limit the ability of the system to control smoke, and no one shall remove such a smoke control system except for repair or installation of a proper replacement.

Laws 1972, LB 1360, § 4;

Laws 1976, LB 823, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2204;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 462.